District of Columbia statutes.
11-1729

Service of United States marshal.

The United States Marshal for the District of Columbia shall continue to serve the courts of the District of Columbia, subject to the supervision of the Attorney General of the United States.

History

July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 512, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 111

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 11-1729.
1973 Ed., § 11-1729.